Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.170

Penalty.

Whoever violates or aids in the violation of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.44.170. Prior: 1939 c 219 s 14; RRS s 6266-14.]